app/agents/word_discovery/FST/class.verb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
 rr rd rdd dj bb kk dd djdj
 ng rn rl rr nj
 [N] [V] [NonPst] [PstPerf] [PstImperf] [Irr] [Imp]
 [3pl.3pl] [3pl.3sg] [3pl.2] [3pl.1]
 [3sg.1] [3sg.2] [3sg.3sg] [3sg.3pl]
 [2sg.1] [2sg.3]
 [2pl.1] [2pl.3sg] [2pl.3pl]
 [1pl.2] [1pl.3sg] [1pl.3pl]
 [1sg.2] [1sg.3]
 @R.VALENCE.INTR@ @R.TENSE.NP@
 @P.VALENCE.INTR@ @P.TENSE.NP@
 @R.VALENCE.TRNS@ @R.TENSE.P@
 @P.VALENCE.TRNS@ @P.TENSE.P@
 @P.PERS.T@ @R.PERS.T@
 @P.VALENCE.AUGM@ @R.VALENCE.AUGM@
 @P.TYPE.N@ @R.TYPE.N@
 @P.TYPE.V@ @R.TYPE.V@
 (ku) (rr) (r) (~~)
 [GUESS] 
 [VerbRootGuess]

LEXICON Root
@P.TYPE.V@ TSOPreBase ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   General Incorporable Nouns                !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PostNominal
@R.TYPE.V@ BPINPreBase ;
@R.TYPE.N@ # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   PRONOMINALS                       !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON TSOPreBase 
!!   Singular - Intransitives !!
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.P@ SingleIntransPastTSO ;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.NP@ SingleIntransNonPastTSO ;
!!  Dual - Intransitives !!
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.P@ DualIntransPastTSO ;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.NP@ DualIntransNonPastTSO ;
!!  Trial - Intransitives !!
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.P@ TrialIntransPastTSO ;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.NP@ TrialIntransNonPastTSO ;
!!  Plural - Intransitives !!
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.P@ PluralIntransPastTSO ;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.NP@ PluralIntransNonPastTSO ; 

!!  Transitives - 3 Single obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast3pObjTSO ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast3pObjTSO ; 
!! Transitives - 3 Dual Obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast3pDualObjTSO ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast3pDualObjTSO ; 
!! Transitives - 3 Plural Obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast3PlObjTSO ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast3PlObjTSO ; 
!! Transitives - 2 Person Obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast2Obj ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast2Obj ; 
!! Transitives - 1 person obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast1Obj ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast1Obj ; 

LEXICON SingleIntransPastTSO
[V][1sg.past]:nga^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.past]:yi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.past]:0^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.past]:bi^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON SingleIntransNonPastTSO
[V][1sg.nonpast]:nga^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.nonpast]:yi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.nonpast]:ka^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON DualIntransPastTSO
[V][12m.past]:ngar(r)^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.past]:ngane^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.past]:ngune^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3ua.past]:bene^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON DualIntransNonPastTSO
[V][12m.nonpast]:ngar(r)^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.nonpast]:ngane^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.nonpast]:ngune^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3ua.nonpast]:kabene^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TrialIntransPastTSO
[V][12ua.past]:kane^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TrialIntransNonPastTSO
[V][12ua.nonpast]:kane^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON PluralIntransPastTSO
[V][1pl.excl.past]:ngarri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.past]:karri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.past]:ngurri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.past]:birri^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON PluralIntransNonPastTSO
[V][1pl.excl.nonpast]:ngarri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.nonpast]:karri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.nonpast]:ngurri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.nonpast]:kabirri^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TransPast3pObjTSO
[V][1sg.3sg.past]:nga^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.3sg.past]:yi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.3sg.past]:0^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.3Hsg.past]:bi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12m.3sg.past]:ngarr^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3sg.past]:ngune^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3sg.past]:ngane^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3ua.3sg.past]:bene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3sg.past]:kane^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3sg.past]:ngarri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3sg.past]:karri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3sg.past]:ngurri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.3sg.past]:birri^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TransNonPast3pObjTSO
[V][1sg.3sg.nonpast]:nga^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.3sg.nonpast]:yi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.3sg.nonpast]:ka^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.3Hsg.nonpast]:kabi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12m.3sg.nonpast]:ngarr^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3sg.nonpast]:ngane^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3sg.nonpast]:ngune^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3ua.3sg.nonpast]:kabene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3sg.nonpast]:kane^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3sg.nonpast]:ngarri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3sg.nonpast]:karri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3sg.nonpast]:ngurri^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.3sg.nonpast]:kabirri^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TransPast3pDualObjTSO
[V][1sg.3ua.past]:ngabenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.3ua.past]:yibenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.3ua.past]:benbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.3ua.past]:benmene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12m.3ua.past]:ngarrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3ua.3ua.past]:bindi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3ua.past]:ngunebenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3ua.past]:ngurrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3ua.past]:nganebenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3ua.past]:ngarrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3ua.past]:kanebenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3ua.past]:karrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3ua.past]:ngarribenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3ua.past]:ngarrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3ua.past]:karribenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3ua.past]:karrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3ua.past]:ngurribenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3ua.past]:ngurrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.3ua.past]:bindi^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TransNonPast3pDualObjTSO
[V][1sg.3ua.nonpast]:ngabenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.3ua.nonpast]:yibenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.3ua.nonpast]:kabenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12m.3ua.nonpast]:ngarrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3ua.3ua.nonpast]:kabindi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3ua.nonpast]:ngunebenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3ua.nonpast]:ngurrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3ua.nonpast]:nganebenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3ua.nonpast]:ngarrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3ua.nonpast]:kanebenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3ua.nonpast]:karrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3ua.nonpast]:ngarribenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3ua.nonpast]:ngarrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3ua.nonpast]:karribenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3ua.nonpast]:karrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3ua.nonpast]:ngurribenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3ua.nonpast]:ngurrbenbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.3ua.nonpast]:kabindi^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TransPast3PlObjTSO
[V][1sg.3pl.past]:ngaben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.3pl.past]:yiben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.3pl.past]:ben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12m.3pl.past]:ngarrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3ua.3pl.past]:bindi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3pl.past]:nguneben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3pl.past]:ngurrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3pl.past]:nganeben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3pl.past]:ngarrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3pl.past]:kaneben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3pl.past]:karrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3pl.past]:ngarriben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3pl.past]:ngarrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3pl.past]:karriben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3pl.past]:karrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3pl.past]:ngurriben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3pl.past]:ngurrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.3pl.past]:bindi^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TransNonPast3PlObjTSO
[V][1sg.3pl.nonpast]:ngaben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.3pl.nonpast]:yiben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.3pl.nonpast]:kaben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12m.3pl.nonpast]:ngarrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3ua.3pl.nonpast]:kabindi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3pl.nonpast]:nguneben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2ua.3pl.nonpast]:ngurrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3pl.nonpast]:nganeben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1ua.excl.3pl.nonpast]:ngarrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3pl.nonpast]:kaneben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][12ua.3pl.nonpast]:karrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3pl.nonpast]:ngarriben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.excl.3pl.nonpast]:ngarrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3pl.nonpast]:karriben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.incl.3pl.nonpast]:karrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3pl.nonpast]:ngurriben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.3pl.nonpast]:ngurrben^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.3pl.nonpast]:kabindi^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON NounBase
0:barrarn^ PostNominal ; 
0:berd^ PostNominal ;
0:bim^ PostNominal ;
0:bili^ PostNominal ;
0:birli^ PostNominal ;
0:bo^ PostNominal ;
0:boy^ PostNominal ;                                            ! antbed
0:bodahkenboy^ PostNominal ;
0:bolh^ PostNominal ;
0:bolk^ PostNominal ;
0:bong^ PostNominal ;
0:bule^ PostNominal ;
0:bunj^ PostNominal ;
0:dabu^ PostNominal ;
0:dalk^ PostNominal ;
0:deleng^ PostNominal ;
0:djalk^ PostNominal ;
0:djalkno^ PostNominal ;
0:dolng^ PostNominal ;
0:dule^ PostNominal ;
0:dulk^ PostNominal ;
0:(rr)ulk^ PostNominal ;
0:dung^ PostNominal ;
0:(rr)ung^ PostNominal ;
0:dorrh^ PostNominal ;
0:djorrh^ PostNominal ;
0:djurle^ PostNominal ;
0:djurrk^ PostNominal ;
0:kabo^ PostNominal ;
0:galh^ PostNominal ;
0:galhno^ PostNominal ;
0:kanj^ PostNominal ;
0:kunj^ PostNominal ;                                   ! kangaroo
0:karre^ PostNominal ;
0:kayinj^ PostNominal ;
0:korle^ PostNominal ;                                        ! bamboo spear
0:go^ PostNominal ;
0:gono^ PostNominal ;
0:ngolek^ PostNominal ;                                      ! breath
0:kod^ PostNominal ;
0:kole^ PostNominal ;
0:golk^ PostNominal ;
0:karrk^ PostNominal ;
0:korrk^ PostNominal ;
0:kuk^ PostNominal ;
0:kurlah^ PostNominal ;
0:kurlk^ PostNominal ;
0:labbal^ PostNominal ;                                      ! billabong
0:lod^ PostNominal ;
0:madj^ PostNominal ;
0:mala^ PostNominal ;
0:marrwe^ PostNominal ;
0:malayi^ PostNominal ;
0:mayhmayh^ PostNominal ;                                   ! birds
0:me^ PostNominal ;
0:moken^ PostNominal ;
0:mudda^ PostNominal ;
0:ngale^ PostNominal ;
0:ngey^ PostNominal ;
0:bolkngey^ PostNominal ;
0:ngui^ PostNominal ;
0:red^ PostNominal ;
0:rerrng^ PostNominal ;
0:njilk^ PostNominal ;
0:rak^ PostNominal ;
0:rud^ PostNominal ;
0:rurrk^ PostNominal ;
0:wabban^ PostNominal ;
0:wardde^ PostNominal ;
0:wok^ PostNominal ;
0:yahwurd^ PostNominal ;
0:yau^ PostNominal ;
0:yaw^ PostNominal ;
0:yerrng^ PostNominal ;
0:yiwk^ PostNominal ;
